Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Nominations by Petition.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 89-96, 106-110, 130-148.

Right of signer of petition or remonstrance to withdraw therefrom or revoke withdrawal, and time therefor. 27 ALR2d 604.

Sec. 15.25.140.
Provision for no-party candidate nominations.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.150.
Date of filing petition.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.160.
Required number of signatures for statewide office.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.170.
Required number of signatures for district-wide office.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.180.
Requirements for petition.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.185.
Eligibility of candidate.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.190.
Placement of names on general election ballot.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.200.
Withdrawal of candidate’s name.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.25.205.
Placement of nominee on general election ballot. [Repealed, § 11 ch 103 SLA 2001.]

Secs. 15.25.220 — 15.25.280.
Presidential party primary election. [Repealed, § 1 ch 2 SLA 1984.]